DI-628
DIAGNOSTICS - SUPPLEMENTALRESTRAINT SYSTEM

DIATL-01

DTC B 1149/37 Front Airbag Sensor LH Malfunction

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

The front airbag sensor LH circuit consists of the diagnosis circuit and frontal deceleration sensor, etc.

If receives signals from the frontal deceleration sensor, judges whether or not the SRS must be activated,
and detects diagnosis system malfunction.

DTC B1149/37 is recorded when malfunction is detected in the front airbag sensor LH circuit.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area
* Frontairbag sensorLH
* Airbag sensorassembly

B1149/37 * Frontairbag sensor LH malfunction e Dashwire

* EngineroomNo. 2 wire
* Engineroommain wire

HINT:
DTC B1149/37 is indicated only for the vehicle equipped with the side airbag and without the side airbag
(dual stage airbag).
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Is DTC B1149/37 output?

CHECK:
(@  Turnthe ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-
ON conds.
(b) Clear the DTC stored in memory (See page DI-432).
@ (¢)  Turn the ignition switch to LOCK, and wait at least for 10
seconds.
(d)  Turnthe ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-
conds.
DLC3 DTCB1149/37 | (e) Check the DTC (See page DI-432).
A = OK:
\ M/ I | % orc riasar is output
CG TC HINT:
Codes other than code B1149/37 may be output at this time, but
T oa0e Hi6831 wir10e| they are not relevant to this check.

normal. To make sure of this, use the simulation
method to check.

NO> The malfunctioning part can now be considered

YES
~_—

2 [Is connector of front airbag sensor LH properly connected?

NO> Connect connector.

YES

3 Prepare for inspection (See step 1 on page DI-764).

A
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DI-630

DIAGNOSTICS - SUPPLEMENTALRESTRAINT SYSTEM

4 Check wire harness.
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PREPARATION:
Using aservice wire, connect+SLand -SLonthefrontairbag
sensor LH side betweenthe airbag sensorassembly andthe
frontairbag sensor LH.
CHECK:
Measuretheresistance between+SLand - SLontheairbag
sensorassembly side betweenthe frontairbag sensor LHand
the airbag sensor assembly.
OK:

Resistance: Below 1 Q

NG> Go to step 8.

5 | Check wire harness (to ground).
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CHECK:
Measure the resistance between the body ground and each of
+SLand -SLontheairbagsensorassembly side betweenthe
frontairbag sensor LH and the airbag sensorassembly.
OK:

Resistance: 1 MQ2 or Higher

NGé&\to step 10.
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DIAGNOSTICS - SUPPLEMENTALRESTRAINTSYSTEM

6 | Check wire harness (to B+).
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PREPARATION:

Connectthe negative ( -) terminal cable tothe battery, and wait

atleastfor2seconds.

CHECK:

(@) Turntheignition switchto ON.

(b) Measure the voltage between the body ground and each
of+SLand -SLontheairbagsensorassembly side be-
tween the front airbag sensor LH and the airbag sensor
assembly.

OK:
Voltage: Below 1V

NGé&\ tostep 12.
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DIAGNOSTICS -

SUPPLEMENTAL RESTRAINT SYSTEM

7 | Check airbag sensor assembly.
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OK
~_—

PREPARATION:

(@)  Turn the ignition switch to LOCK.

(b) Disconnect the negative (=) terminal cable from the bat-
tery, and wait at least for 90 seconds.

(c) Connect the connector to the airbag sensor assembly.

(d) Change the front airbag sensor RH position with LH posi-
tion.

(e) Connect the negative (=) terminal cable to the battery,
and wait at least for 2 seconds.

CHECK:

(@) Turn the ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-
conds.

(b) Clear the DTC stored in memory (See page DI-432).

(c) Turn the ignition switch to LOCK, and wait at least for 10
seconds.

(d)  Turn the ignition switch to ON, and wait at least for 10 se-
conds.

(e) Checkthe DTC (See page DI-432).

OK:
Neither DTC B1148/36 nor B1149/37 not output.

HINT:

Codes other than code B1149/37 or B1148/36 may be output
at this time, but they are not relevant to this check.

NG>

Replace airbag sensor assembly
(DTC B1149/37 is output).

NG>

Replace front airbag sensor LH
(DTC B1148/36 is output).

From the results of the above inspection, the malfunctioning part can now be considered normal.
To make sure of this, use the simulation method to check.
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8 [ Check engine room main wire.

Engine Room
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OK

PREPARATION:
(a) Disconnect the engine room main wire connector on the
airbag sensor assembly side.
(b) Using a service wire, connect +SL and —SL of the engine
room main wire on the front airbag sensor LH side.
CHECK:
Measure the resistance between +SL and —SL of the engine
room main wire connector on the airbag sensor assembly side.
OK:
Resistance: Below 1 Q

)

Repair or replace engine room main wire.

9 [Check engine room No. 2 wire.

Engine Room

No. 2 Wire Dash Wire
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OK

PREPARATION:

(a) Disconnect the engine room No. 2 wire connector from
the dash wire.

(b) Using a service wire, connect +SL and —SL of the engine
room No. 2 wire on the engine room main wire side.

CHECK:

Measure the resistance between +SL and —-SL of the engine

room No. 2 wire connector on the dash wire side.

OK:
Resistance: Below 1 Q

Repair or replace engine room No. 2 wire.

o )

Repair or replace dash wire.
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10 | Check engine room main wire (to ground).
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OK

PREPARATION:
Disconnect the engine room main wire connector on the airbag
sensor assembly side.
CHECK:
Measure the resistance between the body ground and each of
+SL and —SL of the engine room main wire connector on the air-
bag sensor assembly side.
OK:

Resistance: 1 MQ or Higher

)

Repair or replace engine room main wire.

11 | Check engine room No. 2 wire (to ground).
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OK

PREPARATION:
Disconnect the engine room No. 2 wire connector from the dash
wire.
CHECK:
Measure the resistance between the body ground and each of
+SL and -SL of the engine room No. 2 wire connector on the
dash wire side.
OK:

Resistance: 1 MQ or Higher

Repair or replace engine room No. 2 wire.

)

Repair or replace dash wire.
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12 | Check engine room main wire (to B+).
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OK

PREPARATION:

(@)  Turn the ignition switch to LOCK.

(b) Disconnect the negative (=) terminal cable from the bat-
tery, and wait at least for 90 seconds.

(c) Disconnect the engine room main wire connector on the
airbag sensor assembly side.

(d) Connecthe negative (-) terminal cable to the battery, and
wait at least for 2 seconds.

CHECK:

(@) Turn the ignition switch to ON.

(b) Measure the voltage between the body ground and each
of +SL and -SL of the engine room main wire connector
on the airbag sensor assembly side.

OK:

Voltage: Below 1V

)

Repair or replace engine room main wire.

13 | Check engine room No. 2 wire (to B+).
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OK

PREPARATION:

(@) Turn the ignition switch to LOCK.

(b) Disconnect the negative (=) terminal cable from the bat-
tery, and wait at least for 90 seconds.

(c) Disconnect the engine room No. 2 wire connector from
the dash wire.

(d) Connect the negative (=) terminal cable to the battery,
and wait at least for 2 seconds.

CHECK:

(@) Turn the ignition switch to ON.

(b) Measure the voltage between the body ground and each
of +SL and —SL of the engine room No. 2 wire connector
on the dash wire side.

OK:

Voltage: Below 1V

o )

Repair or replace engine room No. 2 wire.

Repair or replace dash wire.
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